Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB407.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 216B.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet shall have four (4) separate and distinct functions in administering this
chapter:
(a) To approve or deny certificates of need in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter, except as to those applications which have been granted
nonsubstantive review status by the cabinet;
(b) To issue and to revoke certificates of need;
(c) To provide a due process hearing and issue a final determination on all actions
by the cabinet to deny, revoke, modify, or suspend licenses of health facilities
and health services issued by the cabinet; and
(d) To enforce, through legal actions on its own motion, the provisions of this
chapter and its orders and decisions issued pursuant to its functions.
(2) The cabinet shall:
(a) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with[pursuant to the
provisions of] KRS Chapter 13A to establish:
1. [To establish ]The certificate of need review procedures, including but
not limited to[,] application procedures, notice provisions, procedures
for review of completeness of applications, and timetables for review
cycles; and[.]
2. [To establish ]Criteria for issuance and denial of certificates of need,
which shall be limited to the following considerations:
a. Consistency with plans. Each proposal approved by the cabinet
shall be consistent with the state health plan, and shall be subject
to biennial budget authorizations and limitations, and with
consideration given to the proposal's impact on health care costs in
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 11/18/2025 8:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 975
the Commonwealth. The state health plan shall contain a need
assessment for long-term care beds, which shall be based on a
statistically valid analysis of the present and future needs of the
state as a whole and counties individually. The need assessment
shall be applied uniformly to all areas of the state. The
methodology shall be reviewed and updated on an annual basis.
The long-term care bed need criteria in the state health plan or as
set forth by the appropriate certificate of need authority shall give
preference to conversion of personal care beds and acute care beds
to nursing facility beds, so long as the state health plan or the
appropriate certificate of need authority establishes a need in the
affected counties and the proposed conversions are more cost-
effective than new construction. The fact that the state health plan
shall not address the specific type of proposal being reviewed shall
not constitute grounds for disapproval of the proposal.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the long-term care
bed need criteria in the state health plan or as set forth by the
appropriate certificate of need authority shall not consider, factor
in, or include any continuing care retirement community's nursing
home beds established under KRS 216B.015, 216B.020,
216B.330, and 216B.332;
b. Need and accessibility. The proposal shall meet an identified need
in a defined geographic area and be accessible to all residents of
the area. A defined geographic area shall be defined as the area the
proposal seeks to serve, including its demographics, and shall not
be limited to geographical boundaries;
c. Interrelationships and linkages. The proposal shall serve to
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 11/18/2025 8:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 975
accomplish appropriate and effective linkages with other services,
facilities, and elements of the health care system in the region and
state, accompanied by assurance of effort to achieve
comprehensive care, proper utilization of services, and efficient
functioning of the health care system;
d. Costs, economic feasibility, and resources availability. The
proposal, when measured against the cost of alternatives for
meeting needs, shall be judged to be an effective and economical
use of resources, not only of capital investment, but also ongoing
requirements for health manpower and operational financing;
e. Quality of services. The applicant shall be prepared to and capable
of undertaking and carrying out the responsibilities involved in the
proposal in a manner consistent with appropriate standards and
requirements assuring the provision of quality health care services,
as established by the cabinet; and
f. Hospital-based skilled nursing, intermediate care, and personal
care beds shall be considered by the cabinet in determining the
need for freestanding long-term care beds; and[.]
(b) Conduct public hearings, as requested by:
1. An applicant for a certificate of need, in respect to that applicant's
certificate of need application;
2. A holder of a certificate of need, in respect to a revocation of that
holder's certificate of need; or
3. A holder of a license, in respect to a denial, suspension, modification,
or revocation of that holder's license[certificate-of-need applications,
revocations of certificates of need, and denials, suspensions,
modifications, or revocations of licenses].
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 11/18/2025 8:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 975
(3) The cabinet may:
(a) Promulgate[Issue] other administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A necessary for the proper administration of this chapter;
(b) Administer oaths, issue subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, and all necessary
process in proceedings brought before or initiated by the cabinet, and the
process shall extend to all parts of the Commonwealth. Service of process in
all proceedings brought before or initiated by the cabinet may be made by
certified mail, or in the same manner as other process in civil cases, as the
cabinet directs;
(c) Establish by promulgation of an administrative regulation in accordance
with[under] KRS Chapter 13A reasonable application fees for certificates of
need;
(d) Establish a mechanism for issuing advisory opinions to prospective applicants
for certificates of need regarding the requirements of a certificate of need; and
(e) Establish a mechanism for biennial review of projects for compliance with the
terms of the certificate of need.
Section 2. KRS 216B.062 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Applications for certificates of need shall be submitted according to timetables
established by the cabinet by promulgation of an administrative regulation[,
pursuant to the provisions of] in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A. The
application for a certificate of need shall include the name and business address of
any owner, investor, or stockholder in the project whose ownership interest is
greater than ten percent (10%). Once an application has been deemed complete
pursuant to the cabinet's administrative regulations, notice shall be given as
provided by the administrative regulations of the beginning of the review, the
proposed review schedule, and the right of an applicant to request a hearing. The
review shall be deemed to commence on the date of notice. The cabinet shall issue
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 11/18/2025 8:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 975
a final decision on an application within[No review shall take longer than] ninety
(90) days from the commencement of the review unless the applicant agrees to a
deferral of action.
(2) Applications proposing the same or similar types of services, facilities, or
equipment shall be batched for review purposes, excluding those granted
nonsubstantive review status. The cabinet shall by promulgation of an
administrative regulation in accordance with[under] KRS Chapter 13A establish
appropriate batching groups to assure that applications for each type of service,
facility, or equipment will be eligible for consideration at set intervals. In each
review batch, the cabinet shall review and, if appropriate, compare all timely-filed
applications proposing similar types of services, facilities, or equipment in the same
health service areas.
Section 3. KRS 216B.085 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No later than fifteen (15) days after the date the review commences, an
applicant[any affected person] may request a public hearing. Hearings shall be
before a person designated by the Office of Administrative Hearings within the
Department of Law to serve as hearing officer. The hearing officer shall be
authorized to administer oaths, issue subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, and all
necessary process in the proceedings.
(2) If a hearing is requested, the Office of Administrative Hearings within the
Department of Law shall set a date, time, and place for a public hearing.
Reasonable notice of the hearing shall be given to the applicant[all affected
persons] in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(3) At the hearing, the applicant[any party to the proceedings] shall have the right to be
represented by counsel, and to present oral or written arguments and evidence
relevant to the matter which is the subject of the hearing[, and may conduct
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 11/18/2025 8:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 975
reasonable cross-examination under oath of persons who make factual allegations
relevant to such matters]. A full and complete record shall be maintained of the
hearing.
(4) Any decision of the cabinet to issue or deny a certificate of need shall be based
solely on the record established with regard to the matter. All decisions granting,
denying, or modifying a certificate of need shall be made by the cabinet in writing.
The cabinet shall notify the applicant[parties to the proceedings] of the decision
and the decision shall be final for purposes of judicial appeal unless a request for
reconsideration is filed by the applicant. An approved certificate of need shall be
issued forty (40) days after notice of the cabinet's decision[ unless a request for
reconsideration is filed or a judicial appeal is taken and issuance is enjoined by the
court].
Section 4. KRS 216B.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An applicant[Any party to the proceedings] may, for good cause shown, request in
writing a hearing for purposes of reconsideration of a decision of the cabinet
pertaining to a certificate of need or the revocation of a certificate of need under
procedures promulgated by administrative regulation in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A. The request shall be filed within fifteen (15) days of the notice of the
decision. For purposes of this section, there shall be deemed to be "good cause
shown" if the request for a public hearing:
(a) Presents significant, relevant information not previously available for
consideration by the cabinet;
(b) Demonstrates that there have been significant changes in the factors or
circumstances relied upon by the cabinet in reaching its decision; or
(c) Demonstrates that the cabinet has materially failed to follow its adopted
procedures in reaching its decision[; or
(d) States that a public hearing pursuant to KRS 216B.085 was not conducted
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 11/18/2025 8:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 975
prior to a decision to deny a certificate of need].
(2) If a public hearing is granted, it shall be held within thirty (30) days after the
decision to grant the request for reconsideration. The hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The cabinet shall make its decision
on reconsideration and shall give notice thereof. The decision of the cabinet shall be
final for purposes of judicial appeal. An approved certificate of need shall be issued
forty (40) days after notice of the cabinet's decision unless a judicial appeal is taken
and issuance is enjoined by the court.
Section 5. KRS 216B.095 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An applicant may waive the procedures for formal review of an application for a
certificate of need and request a nonsubstantive review as provided in this
section[below]. The cabinet may grant or deny nonsubstantive review status within
ten (10) days of the date the application is deemed completed[ and shall give notice
to all affected persons of the decision to conduct a nonsubstantive review. Any
affected person other than the applicant may request a hearing by filing a request
with the cabinet within ten (10) days of the notice to conduct a nonsubstantive
review]. As applicable, hearings shall be conducted as provided in KRS 216B.085.
Based solely upon the record established with regard to the matter, the cabinet shall
approve or deny a certificate of need on all projects assigned nonsubstantive review
status within thirty-five (35) days of the determination of nonsubstantive review
status. If the application is denied nonsubstantive review status, it shall
automatically be placed in the formal review process.
(2) If a certificate of need is denied following a nonsubstantive review, the applicant
may request that the application be placed in the next cycle of the formal review
process. [Nothing in ]This subsection shall not require an applicant to pursue a
formal review before obtaining judicial review pursuant to KRS 216B.115.
(3) The cabinet may grant nonsubstantive review status to an application for a
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 11/18/2025 8:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 975
certificate of need which is required:
(a) To change the location of a proposed health facility;
(b) To replace or relocate a licensed health facility, if there is no substantial
change in health services or substantial change in bed capacity;
(c) To replace or repair worn equipment if the worn equipment has been used by
the applicant in a health facility for five (5) years or more;
(d) For cost escalations; or
(e) In other circumstances the cabinet [by administrative regulation ]may
prescribe by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary[ in this
chapter], the cabinet may approve a certificate of need for a project required for the
purposes set out in subsection (3)(a) to (e) of this section, unless it finds the facility
or service with respect to which the capital expenditure is proposed to be made is
not required; or to the extent the facility or services contemplated by the proposed
capital expenditure is addressed in the state health plan, the cabinet finds that the
capital expenditure is not consistent with the state health plan.
(5) The decision of the cabinet approving or denying a certificate of need pursuant to
this section shall be final for purposes of judicial appeal, unless the applicant
requests the application be placed in the formal review process. An approved
certificate shall be issued thirty (30) days after notice of the cabinet's decision,
unless a judicial appeal is taken and issuance is enjoined by the court.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the cabinet shall not grant
nonsubstantive review status to a certificate of need application that indicates an
intent to apply for Medicaid certification of nursing home beds within a continuing
care retirement community established under KRS 216B.015, 216B.020, 216B.330,
and 216B.332.
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 11/18/2025 8:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 975
(7) Notwithstanding any provision of state law or the state health plan promulgated by
administrative regulation in accordance with KRS 216B.040, the cabinet shall grant
nonsubstantive review for a certificate of need proposal to establish an ambulatory
surgical center if the applicant complies with the following:
(a) The applicant is an ambulatory surgical center that was organized and in
operation as the private office of a physician or physician group prior to
October 1, 2006;
(b) 1. The cabinet's general counsel has submitted a letter to the Accreditation
Association for Ambulatory Health Care advising that the cabinet does
not object to the applicant's parent company applying for and obtaining
Medicare certification; or
2. The applicant is an ambulatory surgical center that has received from the
cabinet a favorable advisory opinion dated June 14, 2005, confirming
that the applicant would be exempt from the certificate of need or
licensure requirement;
(c) The applicant's ambulatory surgical center has been inspected and accredited
by the Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health Care since December
31, 2006, and has maintained accreditation with that organization consistently
since that time; and
(d) The applicant was a party to litigation concerning the ambulatory surgical
center and physician office issue and, prior to July 12, 2012, obtained a Court
of Appeals ruling in its favor.
Section 6. KRS 216B.115 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An appeal to the Franklin Circuit Court may be taken from any final decision of the
cabinet with respect to a certificate-of-need application, a certificate of need, or a
license, by an applicant[any party to the proceedings].
(2) An appeal may be taken by filing a petition for review in the Franklin Circuit Court
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 11/18/2025 8:54 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 975
within thirty (30) days after notice of the final decision unless a request for
reconsideration has been filed, in which case the petition shall be filed within
fifteen (15) days of the cabinet's decision not to reconsider or notice of its decision
on reconsideration. The petition shall state completely the grounds upon which the
review is sought and shall assign all errors relied upon. The petitioner shall serve a
copy of the petition to each person who was a party to the proceedings. Summons
shall be issued upon the petition directing the adverse party or parties to file an
answer within twenty (20) days after service of summons. The cabinet shall, upon
being served with the summons and within thirty (30) days thereafter, file a copy of
the record, duly certified by the secretary, the cost of the record to be taxed as costs
upon appeal. In lieu of filing of the record, an abstract thereof may be filed if all
parties to the appeal agree.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 11/18/2025 8:54 AM Jacketed